South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S123.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-11-15(F) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (F) If, after the closing of the time for filing the documents required pursuant to this section, there are not more than two candidates for any one office and one or more of the candidates dies, or withdraws, the state or county committee, as the case may be, if the nomination is by political party primary or political party convention only may, in its discretion, afford opportunity for the entry of other candidates for the office involved;  however, for the office of State House of Representatives or State Senator, the discretion must be exercised by the state committee. (1) In order for a state or county committee to allow entry of other candidates for the office, the committee must: (a) hold a public hearing within forty-eight hours of the death or withdrawal of the candidate or candidates; and (b) publicly vote to allow reopening of the time to file for the office. (2) The additional filing period for the office shall consist of three business days following the vote authorizing reopening of the time to file. (3) Any withdrawal must be in writing to the Director of the County Board of Voter Registration and Elections in which the candidate filed. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----